Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-707
Intersections between railroads and highways; crossing of wires; regulation.

The commission shall regulate the crossing of wires across railroad rights-of-way at public highways within the state, except that when the crossing entity is a railroad operator, the owners shall attempt to agree upon the terms and conditions of such crossing, and if such agreement cannot be concluded, the commission shall determine the terms and conditions subject to the provisions of sections 75-702 to 75-708.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 7, p. 1423;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 119.